Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
INSPECTION REQUIREMENTS

§159-21 Ante-mortem inspection. (a)
For the purpose of preventing the use in intrastate commerce of meat or meat
products which are adulterated, the board shall cause to be made, by a
veterinarian or inspector appointed for that purpose, an examination and
inspection of all animals before they shall be allowed to enter into any
slaughtering, packing, meat-canning, rendering, or similar establishment in the
State in which slaughtering and preparation of meat or meat products of the
animals are conducted solely for intrastate commerce; and all animals found on
the inspection to show symptoms of disease shall be set apart from all other
animals and slaughtered or otherwise disposed of as provided in the rules and
regulations, and when slaughtered, the carcasses of the animals shall be
subject to a careful examination and inspection, all as prescribed by the
board.

(b) For the purpose of preventing the inhumane
slaughtering of animals, the board shall cause to be made, by inspectors
appointed for that purpose, an examination and inspection of the method by
which the animals are slaughtered and handled in connection with slaughter in
the slaughtering establishments inspected under this chapter. The board may
refuse to provide inspection to a new slaughtering establishment or may cause
inspection to be temporarily suspended at a slaughtering establishment, if the
board finds that any animal has been slaughtered or handled in connection with
slaughter at such establishment by any method not in accordance with subsection
(c), until the establishment furnishes assurances satisfactory to the board
that all slaughtering and handling in connection with slaughter of animals is
in accordance with a method specified in subsection (c).

(c) Either of the following two methods of
slaughtering of animals and handling in connection with slaughter are found to
be humane:

(1) By rendering the animal insensible to pain by a
single blow or gunshot or an electrical, chemical, or other means that is rapid
and effective, before being shackled, hoisted, thrown, cast, or cut; or

(2) By slaughtering or handling in connection with
slaughtering in accordance with the ritual requirements of the Jewish faith or
any other religious faith that prescribes a method of slaughter whereby the
animal suffers loss of consciousness by anemia of the brain caused by the
simultaneous and instantaneous severance of the carotid arteries with a sharp
instrument.

(d) For the purposes of this section
"animals" means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other
equines. [L 1969, c 214, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 178, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next